Hawaii statutes.
§14-27 Filling vacancies of presidential
electors. In case of the death or absence of any elector chosen, or if the
number of electors is deficient for any other reason, the vacancy or vacancies
shall be filled by the alternates in the order of their numerical designation
for their respective electors causing the vacancy or vacancies, and in the
event that vacancy or vacancies still exist, then the electors present shall
select from the members of the same political party or group as many persons as
will supply the deficiency. Certificates for the alternates or substitutes as
presidential electors shall be issued by the governor. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
am L 1981, c 100, §2(4)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next